District of Columbia statutes.
31-5713

Repealed

Fraudulent representations.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1315, ch. 854, § 761
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329, § 761
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1213.
1973 Ed., § 35-913.